Hawaii statutes.
§6K-9.5 Kaho‘olawe rehabilitation trust
fund. (a) There is created in the state treasury a trust fund to be
designated as the Kaho‘olawe rehabilitation trust fund to be administered by
the department with the prior approval of the commission. Subject to Public
Law 103-139, and this chapter:

(1) All moneys received from the federal government
for the rehabilitation and environmental restoration of the island of
Kaho‘olawe or other purposes consistent with this chapter;

(2) Any moneys appropriated by the legislature to the
trust fund;

(3) Any moneys received from grants, donations, or
the proceeds from contributions; and

(4) The interest or return on investments earned from
moneys in the trust fund,

shall be deposited in the trust fund and shall be used
to fulfill the purposes of this chapter.

(b) The commission may use moneys in the trust
fund to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including hiring employees,
specialists, and consultants necessary to complete projects related to the
purposes of this chapter.

(c) Moneys deposited into or appropriated to
the trust fund shall remain available until they are obligated or until the
trust fund is terminated.

(d) If the trust fund is terminated, all funds
shall be transferred to the general fund; provided that all unexpended or
unencumbered balances shall be disbursed in accordance with any requirements
set by funding sources and for purposes consistent with this chapter.

(e) The commission shall submit an annual
report on the status of the Kaho‘olawe rehabilitation trust fund to the
legislature, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular
session of the legislature. The annual report shall include the total number
of and amount of grants, donations, and contributions received and balances
remaining on June 30 of each year. [L 1994, c 161, §2; am L 2001, c 126, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next